Missouri, session 2026, SB1240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.011, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.011,
to read as follows:
143.011. 1. For all tax years beginning on or before
December 31, 2026, a tax is hereby imposed for every taxable
year on the Missouri taxable income of every resident. The
tax shall be determined by applying the tax table or the
rate provided in section 143.021, which is based upon the
following rates:
If the Missouri The tax is:
taxable income is:
Not over $1,000.00 1 1/2% of the Missouri
taxable income
Over $1,000 but not $15 plus 2% of excess over
over $2,000 $1,000
Over $2,000 but not $35 plus 2 1/2% of excess
over $3,000 over $2,000
Over $3,000 but not $60 plus 3% of excess over
over $4,000 $3,000
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1240 2
Over $4,000 but not $90 plus 3 1/2% of excess
over $5,000 over $4,000
Over $5,000 but not $125 plus 4% of excess over
over $6,000 $5,000
Over $6,000 but not $165 plus 4 1/2% of excess
over $7,000 over $6,000
Over $7,000 but not $210 plus 5% of excess over
over $8,000 $7,000
Over $8,000 but not $260 plus 5 1/2% of excess
over $9,000 over $8,000
Over $9,000 $315 plus 6% of excess over
$9,000
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1
of this section to the contrary, beginning with the 2023
calendar year, the top rate of tax pursuant to subsection 1
of this section shall be four and ninety-five hundredths
percent.
(2) The modification of tax rates made pursuant to
this subsection shall apply only to tax years that begin on
or after January 1, 2023.
(3) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax table provided in subsection 1 of
this section to effectuate the provisions of this
subsection. The top remaining rate of tax shall apply to
all income in excess of seven thousand dollars, as adjusted
pursuant to subsection 5 of this section.
3. (1) In addition to the rate reduction under
subsection 2 of this section, beginning with the 2024
calendar year, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of
this section may be reduced by fifteen hundredths of a

SB 1240 3
percent. A reduction in the rate of tax shall take effect
on January first of a calendar year and such reduced rates
shall continue in effect until the next reduction occurs.
(2) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only occur if
the amount of net general revenue collected in the previous
fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net general
revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years prior to
such fiscal year by at least one hundred seventy-five
million dollars.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this
subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
4. [(1) In addition to the rate reductions under
subsections 2 and 3 of this section, beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which a reduction is made pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of this
section may be further reduced over a period of years. Each
reduction in the top rate of tax shall be by one-tenth of a
percent and no more than one reduction shall occur in a
calendar year. No more than three reductions shall be made
under this subsection. Reductions in the rate of tax shall
take effect on January first of a calendar year and such
reduced rates shall continue in effect until the next
reduction occurs.
(2) (a) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only
occur if:
a. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
previous fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net

SB 1240 4
general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years
prior to such fiscal year by at least two hundred million
dollars; and
b. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
previous fiscal year exceeds the amount of net general
revenue collected in the fiscal year five years prior,
adjusted annually by the percentage increase in inflation
over the preceding five fiscal years.
(b) The amount of net general revenue collected
required by subparagraph a. of paragraph (a) of this
subdivision in order to make a reduction pursuant to this
subsection shall be adjusted annually by the percent
increase in inflation beginning with January 2, 2023.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this
subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
The bracket for income subject to the top rate of tax shall
be eliminated once the top rate of tax has been reduced
100 below the rate applicable to such bracket, and the top
101 remaining rate of tax shall apply to all income in excess of
102 the income in the second highest remaining income bracket]
103 For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
104 there shall be no tax imposed upon Missouri taxable income
105 pursuant to this section.
106 5. Beginning with the 2017 calendar year, the brackets
107 of Missouri taxable income identified in subsection 1 of
108 this section shall be adjusted annually by the percent
109 increase in inflation. The director shall publish such
110 brackets annually beginning on or after October 1, 2016.

SB 1240 5
111 Modifications to the brackets shall take effect on January
112 first of each calendar year and shall apply to tax years
113 beginning on or after the effective date of the new brackets.
114 6. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
115 (1) "CPI", the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
116 Consumers for the United States as reported by the Bureau of
117 Labor Statistics, or its successor index;
118 (2) "CPI for the preceding calendar year", the average
119 of the CPI as of the close of the twelve-month period ending
120 on August thirty-first of such calendar year;
121 (3) "Net general revenue collected", all revenue
122 deposited into the general revenue fund, less refunds and
123 revenues originally deposited into the general revenue fund
124 but designated by law for a specific distribution or
125 transfer to another state fund;
126 (4) "Percent increase in inflation", the percentage,
127 if any, by which the CPI for the preceding calendar year
128 exceeds the CPI for the year beginning September 1, 2014,
129 and ending August 31, 2015.
✓